Utah statutes.
13-21-3.   Credit services organizations -- Prohibitions.

(1)  A credit services organization, its salespersons, agents, and representatives, and independent contractors who sell or attempt to sell the services of a credit services organization may not do any of the following:

(a)  conduct any business regulated by this chapter without first:

(i)  securing a certificate of registration from the division; and

(ii)  unless exempted under Section 13-21-4, posting a bond, letter of credit, or certificate of deposit with the division in the amount of $100,000;

(b)  make a false statement, or fail to state a material fact, in connection with an application for registration with the division;

(c)  charge or receive any money or other valuable consideration prior to full and complete performance of the services the credit services organization has agreed to perform for the buyer;

(d)  dispute or challenge, or assist a person in disputing or challenging an entry in a credit report prepared by a consumer reporting agency without a factual basis for believing and obtaining a written statement for each entry from the person stating that that person believes that the entry contains a material error or omission, outdated information, inaccurate information, or unverifiable information;

(e)  charge or receive any money or other valuable consideration solely for referral of the buyer to a retail seller who will or may extend credit to the buyer, if the credit that is or will be extended to the buyer is upon substantially the same terms as those available to the general public;

(f)  make, or counsel or advise any buyer to make, any statement that is untrue or misleading and that is known, or that by the exercise of reasonable care should be known, to be untrue or misleading, to a credit reporting agency or to any person who has extended credit to a buyer or to whom a buyer is applying for an extension of credit, with respect to a buyer's creditworthiness, credit standing, or credit capacity;

(g)  make or use any untrue or misleading representations in the offer or sale of the services of a credit services organization or engage, directly or indirectly, in any act, practice, or course of business  that operates or would operate as fraud or deception upon any person in connection with the offer or sale of the services of a credit services organization; and

(h)  transact any business as a credit services organization, as defined in Section 13-21-2, without first having registered with the division by paying an annual fee set pursuant to Section 63J-1-504 and filing proof that it has obtained a bond or letter of credit as required by Subsection (2).

(2) (a)  A bond, letter of credit from a Utah depository, or certificate of deposit posted with the division shall be used to cover the losses of any person arising from a violation of this chapter by the posting credit services organization.  A bond, letter of credit, or certificate of deposit may also be used to satisfy administrative fines and civil damages arising from any enforcement action against the posting credit service organization.

(b)  A bond, letter of credit, or certificate of deposit shall remain in force:

(i)  until replaced by a bond, letter of credit, or certificate of deposit of identical or superior coverage; or

(ii)  for one year after the credit servicing organization notifies the division in writing that it has ceased all activities regulated by this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 183, 2009 General Session

